en: Assembled in France
ar: جمع في فرنسا
de: Zusammengebaut in Frankreich
es: Montado en Francia
fr: Assemblé en France
it: Assemblato in Francia
ja: フランスで組み立て
ko: 프랑스에서 조립
nl: Geassembleerd in Frankrijk
pl: Zmontowano we Francji
pt: Montado na França
ru: Собрано во Франции
zh: 法国组装

xx: PEGI 3
en: PEGI 3

xx: PEGI 7
en: PEGI 7

xx: PEGI 12
en: PEGI 12

xx: PEGI 16
en: PEGI 16

xx: PEGI 18
en: PEGI 18

en: ESRB Everyone (E)
fr: ESRB Pour Tous (E)

en: ESRB Everyone 10+ (E10+)
fr: ESRB Pour Tous 10+ (E10+)

en: ESRB Teen (T)
fr: ESRB Adolescents (T)

en: ESRB Mature 17+ (M)
fr: ESRB Adultes 17+ (M)

en: ESRB Adults Only 18+ (AO)
fr: ESRB Adultes Seulement 18+ (AO)

en: CERO A
ja: CERO A (全年齢対象)

en: CERO B
ja: CERO B (12才以上対象)

en: CERO C
ja: CERO C (15才以上対象)

en: CERO D
ja: CERO D (17才以上対象)

en: CERO Z
ja: CERO Z (18才以上のみ対象)

en: USK 0
de: USK ab 0 freigegeben

en: USK 6
de: USK ab 6 freigegeben

en: USK 12
de: USK ab 12 freigegeben

en: USK 16
de: USK ab 16 freigegeben